ru: Масштаб модели танка: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Другое
en: Tank model scale: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Other
da: Skala for tankmodel: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Andet
zh-CN: 坦克模型比例: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; 其他
fr: Échelle du modèle réduit de char: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Autre
zh-TW: 坦克模型比例: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; 其他
vi: Tỷ lệ mô hình xe tăng: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Khác
bg-BG: Мащаб на модела на танка: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Друго
pt-BR: Modelo de tanque escala: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Outro
de: Maßstab des Panzermodells: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Sonstige
cs: Měřítko modelu tanku: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Jiné
sl-SI: Merilo makete tanka: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Drugo
ja: 戦車模型スケール: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; その他
sv: Tankmodell skala: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Annat
ko: 탱크 모델 축척: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; 기타
ro-RO: Scară a machetei de tanc: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Altele
it: Scala del modellino di carro armato: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Altro
fi: Panssarivaunumallin mittakaava: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Muu
es: Escala del modelo de tanque: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Otra
nl: Tankmodel schaal: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Overig
hu: Tank modell skálázás: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Egyéb
pt-PT: Escala do modelo de tanque: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Outro
tr: Tank model ölçeği: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Diğer
hr-HR: Razmjer makete tenka: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Ostalo
lt-LT: Tanko modelio mastelis: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Kita
nb: Tankmodellskala: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Annet
th: โมเดลรถถัง ขยายสเกล: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; อื่นๆ
el: Μοντέλο δεξαμενής κλίμακα: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Άλλο
sk-SK: Mierka modelu tanku: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Iné
pl: Skala modelu czołgu: 1:100; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:35; 1:48; 1:56; 1:6; 1:60; 1:64; 1:72; 1:76; 1:87; 1:9; Inna